src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! # Basque adjectives

LEXICON Adjectives

on Aon "buorre" ;
txar Areg "bahá" ;
handi Areg "stuoris" ;
txiki Areg "unni" ;
motz Areg "oanehis" ;
polit Areg "čáppis" ;
